District of Columbia statutes.
8-1808.01

Dog parks.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to establish dog parks on District-owned parkland in which a dog under the verbal command of a responsible adult may exercise off-leash.

(b)

A dog park shall be completely enclosed by a fence and gate, both no less than 5 feet in height.

(c)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section. The rules shall:

(1)

Establish procedures for selecting a site for establishment of a dog park, which shall include notice to the public and an opportunity for public comment; and

(2)

Establish procedures for the operation, maintenance, and use of a dog park, which shall include a process for enforcement of the rules and for monitoring and addressing health and environmental safety concerns.

History

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 9a
as added Dec. 10, 2005, D.C. Law 16-40, § 2(c), 52 DCR 9087

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 3-30, the Animal Control Act of 1979, as amended by D.C. Law 16-40, the Dog Park Establishment Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2007-53, February 7, 2007 ( 54 DCR 2428).